Utah statutes.
20A-11-505.7.   Separate account for contributions for registered political party.

(1)  A registered political party shall deposit a contribution received in one or more separate campaign accounts in a financial institution.

(2)  A registered political party may not deposit or mingle a contribution received into a personal or business account.



Enacted by Chapter 396, 2011 General Session

